Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2617
Use of pharmaceutical
agents or dispensing of contact
lens containing ocular pharmaceutical agent by licensed optometrist;
standard of care.

(1) A licensed optometrist who administers or
prescribes pharmaceutical agents for examination or for treatment shall provide
the same standard of care to patients as that provided by a physician licensed
in this state to practice medicine and surgery utilizing the same pharmaceutical
agents for examination or treatment.

(2) An optometrist
who dispenses a contact lens containing an ocular pharmaceutical agent which
is classified by the federal Food and Drug Administration as a drug shall
comply with the rules and regulations of the board relating to packaging,
labeling, storage, drug utilization review, and record keeping. The board
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to packaging, labeling,
storage, drug utilization review, and record keeping for such contact lenses.

Laws 1993, LB 429, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 369, § 8;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,135.06;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 25;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 890;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 7.